Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB178.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 304.17A-660 TO 304.17A-669 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) (a) As used in this section, "psychiatric collaborative care model":
1. Means the evidence-based, integrated behavioral health service delivery method described in
81 Fed. Reg. 80230 (November 15, 2016); and
2. Includes services that are billed under:
a. Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the following Current
Procedural Terminology billing codes maintained by the American Medical
Association:
i. 99492;
ii. 99493; and
iii. 99494; and
b. Any other Current Procedural Terminology billing codes maintained by the American
Medical Association that are used for the evidence-based, integrated behavioral health
service delivery method described in 81 Fed. Reg. 80230 (November 15, 2016).
(b) The commissioner shall promulgate and maintain an administrative regulation in accordance with
KRS Chapter 13A that lists any:
1. Alterations to the billing codes set forth in paragraph (a)2.a. of this subsection; and
2. Other billing codes that satisfy the requirements of paragraph (a)2.b. of this subsection.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, all health benefit plans that provide coverage for
treatment of a mental health condition shall provide reimbursement for those benefits that are delivered
through the psychiatric collaborative care model.
(3) An insurer may deny reimbursement under a health benefit plan that provides coverage for treatment of a
mental health condition for any benefit billed under a billing code referenced in subsection (1)(a)2. of this
section on the grounds of medical necessity, if the medical necessity determination is:
(a) In compliance with the Paul Wellstone and Pete Domenici Mental Health Parity and Addiction
Equity Act of 2008, codified at 42 U.S.C. sec. 300gg-26, as amended, and any related federal
regulations, as amended; and
(b) Made in accordance with any applicable utilization review requirements set forth in this subtitle,
including but not limited to KRS 304.17A-600 to 304.17A-633.
Section 2. This Act applies to health benefit plans issued, delivered, or renewed on or after January 1,
2027.
Section 3. If it is determined that the application of any requirement of Section 1 of this Act is in addition
to the essential health benefits required under federal law, then the Department of Insurance shall, within 180 days of
the effective date of this section, apply for a waiver under 42 U.S.C. sec. 18052, as amended, or any other applicable
federal law, of all or any of the cost defrayal requirements under 42 U.S.C. sec. 18031(d)(3), as amended, and 45
C.F.R. sec. 155.170, as amended.
Signed by Governor April 13, 2026.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version